Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.090

Specially commissioned peace officer—Powers of, circumstances.

A specially commissioned Washington peace officer who has successfully completed a course of basic training prescribed or approved for such officers by the Washington state criminal justice training commission may exercise any authority which the special commission vests in the officer, throughout the territorial bounds of the state, outside of the officer's primary territorial jurisdiction under the following circumstances:

(1) The officer is in fresh pursuit, as defined in RCW 10.93.120; or

(2) The officer is acting pursuant to mutual law enforcement assistance agreement between the primary commissioning agency and the agency with primary territorial jurisdiction.

[ 1985 c 89 s 9.]